North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-21 Drainage Assessment Projects
61-21-65.
Consolidation of drainage district or districts into water resource districts.

Upon resolution of the board of county commissioners or the water resource board, or upon the filing with the board of county commissioners of a petition containing the signatures of landowners possessing at least fifteen percent of the voting rights in one or more drainage districts, computed in accordance with section 61-21-16, the board of county commissioners shall set a date for hearing upon the establishment or expansion of a water resource district to include the property contained within the drainage district or districts. The board of county commissioners shall publish notice of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, the second publication to be not less than ten nor more than twenty days before the date set for hearing. In the event special assessments remain outstanding upon any property within a drainage district to be affected by a hearing as provided in this section, the board of county commissioners shall notify by ordinary mail at least ten days before the date set for the hearing all landowners of record subject to the special assessments in accordance with the provisions of section 61-21-66. If, at the time and place set for hearing, a majority of affected landowners computed in accordance with section 61-21-16 shall file written objections, further proceedings shall be discontinued. If such majority does not object, the board of county commissioners shall file with the state water commission a petition signed by a majority of the board and all further proceedings shall thereafter be governed by chapters 61-16 and 61-16.1. Upon the establishment or expansion of a water resource district to include one or more drainage districts, the board of county commissioners shall, by resolution, dissolve the drainage districts and transfer all property of the dissolved districts to the water resource district.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 20; 1969, ch. 550, § 1; 1981, ch. 91, § 65.

61-21-66.
Dissolution prohibited when liabilities outstanding — Disposition of assets.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 61-21-65, no drainage district shall be dissolved if such district has any outstanding warrants, bonds, or other obligations unless the order of the board of county commissioners dissolving such district shall provide for a continuance of assessments upon properties within the dissolved district for the payment of outstanding obligations, or an assumption of such obligations by the newly created district and the spreading of such assessments over properties within the newly created district. All sinking funds created for the payment of such obligations shall be continued in force by the new district until the liquidation of such obligations. Any funds in the treasury of the drainage district shall, upon dissolution under the provisions of section 61-21-65, be transferred to the treasury of the water resource district. Such funds may be expended separately or jointly with other funds on projects or activities of the water resource district which are of specific benefit to property in the dissolved drainage district from whence the funds were transferred or, in the discretion of the board of county commissioners, such funds may be prorated among the properties in the dissolved drainage district and credited to such property in proportion with the amount originally assessed as a credit against subsequent assessments by the water resource district.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 21.

61-21-67.
Closing of noncomplying drain — Notice and hearing — Appeal — Injunction.

If the board determines that a drain, lateral drain, or ditch has been opened or established by a landowner or tenant contrary to this chapter or any rules adopted by the board, the board shall notify the landowner by registered mail at the landowner’s post office of record. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the tenant, if any. The notice must specify the nature and extent of the noncompliance and must state that if the drain, lateral drain, or ditch is not closed or filled within the period the board determines, but not less than fifteen days, the board shall procure the closing or filling of the drain, lateral drain, or ditch and assess the cost of the closing or filling, or the portion the board determines, against the property of the landowner responsible. The notice must also state that the affected landowner, within fifteen days of the date the notice is mailed, may demand in writing a hearing upon the matter. Upon receipt of the demand, the board shall set a hearing date within fifteen days from the date the demand is received. In the event of an emergency, the board may immediately apply to the appropriate district court for an injunction prohibiting the landowner or tenant from maintaining the drain, lateral drain, or ditch. Assessments levied under this section must be collected in the same manner as other assessments authorized by this chapter. If, in the opinion of the board, more than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata basis in accordance with the proportionate responsibility of the landowners. A landowner aggrieved by action of the board under this section may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the land is located in accordance with the procedure provided for in section 28-34-01. A hearing as provided for in this section is not a prerequisite to an appeal.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 569, § 3; 1983, ch. 82, § 150; 1989, ch. 83, § 33; 1999, ch. 540, § 4.